Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-619
Game and raw furs illegally acquired or possessed; contraband; seizure and confiscation.

All game taken and all game and raw furs bought, sold, bartered, shipped, or had in possession contrary to any of the provisions of the Game Law shall be and the same are declared to be contraband and shall be seized and confiscated by any conservation officer, other peace officer, or other employee of the commission.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 6, p. 434;

C.S.1929, § 37-606;

R.S.1943, § 37-606;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 14, p. 471;

Laws 1961, c. 175, § 3, p. 523;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 37;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-606;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 309;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 91.

Pheasants legally killed in another state are not subject to confiscation. State v. Allen, 159 Neb. 314, 66 N.W.2d 830 (1954).